Hawaii statutes.
§10-29 Bonds. The resolution or
resolutions authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds may pledge to the payment
thereof all or any part of the revenue of an office project or projects, of a
loan program or programs, or of the office, and the pledge shall constitute a
lien on the revenue of such project or projects, of such loan program or
programs, or of the office to the extent and in the manner in the resolution or
resolutions provided prior and paramount to any claim or other obligation of
any nature against the revenue so pledged subsequently arising or subsequently
incurred. The board may provide in the resolution or resolutions that all
revenue bonds of the same issue shall be equally and ratably secured without
priority by reason of number, date, or maturity of the bonds, date of sale,
execution, or delivery thereof. Any pledge of revenues contained in any
resolution or resolutions adopted under this part shall be valid and binding
from and after the adoption of the resolution or resolutions without physical
delivery of the revenues therein pledged or the necessity of any further action
by the State or the board, or any officer or agent of either the State or
board. [L 1994, c 283, pt of §2(2); am L 2013, c 171, §9]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next